Utah, session 2026, SB170.
Section 1. Section 26B-4-327 is enacted to read:26B-4-327. Vitamin K newborn administration.(1)As used in this section "health care provider" means the same as that term is defined in Section 78B-3-403.(2)A health care provider that provides care to a mother during the birth of a child shall provide a full and clear explanation of the risks and benefits of vitamin K administration and the risks of possible adverse health outcomes for a newborn that does not receive vitamin K.(3)A parent may decline to consent to the administration of vitamin K.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.